nb: Bremseklossmateriale: Karbon-keramisk; Karbonfiber; Keramisk; Kobberfri; Kevlar/aramid; Lavmetallisk NAO; Organisk (NAO); Semimetallisk; Sintret metall; Annet
de: Bremsbelagmaterial: Carbon-Keramik; Kohlefaser; Keramik; Kupferfrei; Kevlar/Aramid; Low-Metallic (NAO); Organisch (NAO); Halbmetallisch; Sintermetall; Sonstige
sk-SK: Materiál brzdových doštičiek: Karbón-keramika; Uhlíkové vlákno; Keramika; Bez medi; Kevlar/aramid; Nízkometalická NAO; Organická (NAO); Polometalický materiál; Spekaný kov (Sintrovaný); Iný
cs: Materiál brzdových destiček: Karbon-keramika; Karbonová vlákna; Keramika; Bez mědi; Kevlar/aramid; Nízkometalické NAO; Organické (NAO); Polometalické; Slinutý kov; Jiné
vi: Vật liệu má phanh: Carbon gốm; Sợi carbon; Gốm; Không chứa đồng; Kevlar/aramid; NAO ít kim loại; Hữu cơ (NAO); Bán kim loại; Kim loại thiêu kết; Khác
bg-BG: Материал на спирачните накладки: Карбон-керамика; Въглеродни влакна; Керамика; Без съдържание на мед; Kevlar/арамид; Нискометална (NAO); Органична (NAO); Полуметална; Синтерован метал; Други
el: Υλικό τακακιού φρένων: Carbon ceramic; Ανθρακόνημα; Κεραμικό; Χωρίς χαλκό; Kevlar/αραμίδιο; Χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε μέταλλο (NAO); Οργανικό (NAO); Ημιμεταλλικό; Πυροσυσσωματωμένο μέταλλο; Άλλο
fi: Jarrupalojen materiaali: Hiilikeraaminen; Hiilikuitu; Keraaminen; Kupariton; Kevlar/aramidi; Vähämetallinen NAO; Orgaaninen (NAO); Puolimetallinen; Sintrattu metalli; Muu
pt-BR: Material da pastilha de freio: Carbono cerâmica; Fibra de carbono; Cerâmica; Sem cobre; Kevlar/aramida; NAO com baixo teor de metal; Orgânico (NAO); Semimetálico; Metal sinterizado; Outro
ko: 브레이크 패드 재질: 카본 세라믹; 카본 파이버; 세라믹; 구리 무첨가; Kevlar/아라미드; 로우 메탈릭 NAO; 유기질(NAO); 세미 메탈릭; 소결 금속; 기타
ro-RO: Materialul plăcuțelor de frână: Carbon ceramic; Fibră de carbon; Ceramică; Fără cupru; Kevlar/aramidă; NAO cu conținut redus de metal; Organic (NAO); Semimetalic; Metal sinterizat; Altele
ru: Материал тормозной колодки: Карбон-керамика; Углеродное волокно; Керамика; Без меди; Kevlar/арамид; Низкометаллический NAO; Органический (NAO); Полуметалл; Спеченный металл; Другое
zh-TW: 煞車片材質: 碳陶瓷; 碳纖維; 陶瓷; 無銅; Kevlar/芳綸; 低金屬 NAO; 有機 (NAO); 半金屬; 燒結金屬; 其他
hu: Fékbetét anyaga: Karbon-kerámia; Szénszál; Kerámia; Rézmentes; Kevlar/aramid; Alacsony fémtartalmú NAO; Organikus (NAO); Félfémes; Szinterezett fém; Egyéb
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำผ้าเบรก: คาร์บอนเซรามิก; คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; เซรามิก; ไร้ทองแดง; Kevlar/อะรามิด; NAO โลหะต่ำ; ออร์แกนิก (NAO); กึ่งโลหะ; โลหะซินเทอร์; อื่นๆ
fr: Matériau de la plaquette de frein: Carbone céramique; Fibre de carbone; Céramique; Sans cuivre; Kevlar/aramide; Faiblement métallique NAO; Organique (NAO); Semi-métallique; Métal fritté; Autre
hr-HR: Materijal kočionih pločica: Ugljična keramika; Ugljična vlakna; Keramika; Bez bakra; Kevlar/aramid; Niskometalni NAO; Organski (NAO); Polumetalik; Sinterirani metal; Ostalo
tr: Fren balatası malzemesi: Karbon seramik; Karbon fiber; Seramik; Bakırsız; Kevlar/aramid; Düşük metalik NAO; Organik (NAO); Yarı metalik; Sinterli metal; Diğer
es: Material de la pastilla de freno: Cerámica de carbono; Fibra de carbono; Cerámica; Sin cobre; Kevlar/aramida; Bajo en metal NAO; Orgánico (NAO); Semimetálico; Metal sinterizado; Otro
sv: Bromsbeläggens material: Kolfiberkeramik; Kolfiber; Keramisk; Kopparfri; Kevlar/aramid; Lågmetallisk (NAO); Organisk (NAO); Semimetallisk; Sintrad metall; Övrigt
nl: Remblok materiaal: Carbon-keramisch; Koolstofvezel; Keramisch; Kopervrij; Kevlar/aramide; Laag-metallisch NAO; Organisch (NAO); Semimetallisch; Gesinterd metaal; Overig
it: Materiale delle pastiglie dei freni: Carboceramica; Fibra di carbonio; Ceramica; Senza rame; Kevlar/aramide; NAO a basso contenuto metallico; Organico (NAO); Semimetallico; Metallo sinterizzato; Altro
da: Materiale i bremseklodsebelægning: Carbon-keramisk; Kulfiber; Keramisk; Kobberfri; Kevlar/aramid; Lavmetallisk NAO; Organisk (NAO); Semimetallisk; Sintermetal; Andet
zh-CN: 刹车片材质: 碳陶瓷; 碳纤维; 陶瓷; 无铜; Kevlar/芳纶; 低金属 NAO; 有机 (NAO); 半金属; 烧结金属; 其他
lt-LT: Stabdžių kaladėlės medžiaga: Anglies pluošto keramika; Anglies pluoštas; Keramika; Be vario; „Kevlar“ / aramidas; Mažo metalingumo NAO; Organinė (NAO); Pusiau metalinė; Sukepinto metalo; Kita
sl-SI: Material zavornih ploščic: Karbonska keramika; Karbonska vlakna; Keramika; Brez bakra; Kevlar/aramid; Nizkokovinski NAO; Organsko (NAO); Polkovinski; Sintrana kovina; Drugo
ja: ブレーキパッドの素材: カーボンセラミック; カーボンファイバー; セラミック; カッパーフリー; Kevlar/アラミド; ロースチールNAO; オーガニック (NAO); セミメタル; 焼結合金 (シンタード); その他
pl: Materiał klocka hamulcowego: Węglowo-ceramiczne; Włókno węglowe; Ceramiczne; Bez miedzi; Kevlar/aramid; Niskometaliczne NAO; Organiczne (NAO); Półmetaliczne; Metal spiekany; Inne
pt-PT: Material da pastilha de travão: Carbono cerâmico; Fibra de carbono; Cerâmica; Sem cobre; Kevlar/aramida; NAO baixo em metal; Orgânico (NAO); Semimetálico; Metal sinterizado; Outro
en: Brake pad material: Carbon ceramic; Carbon fiber; Ceramic; Copper-free; Kevlar/aramid; Low-metallic NAO; Organic (NAO); Semi-metallic; Sintered metal; Other